South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3206.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 9, Chapter 18, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-18-940. Each school district shall: (1) develop for each school in the district a summary that: (a) details racial disparities in student performance relative to national performance levels on federally required academic assessments including, but not limited to, the PSAT, pre-ACT, SAT, ACT, Aspire, Program for International Student Assessment (PISA), and National Assessment of Education Progress (NAEP), as applicable; (b) includes a five-year trend chart of the information provided in subitem (a); (2) annually update the information summary and trend chart provided in item (1); and (3) provide each school in the district with the summary report for that school, updated annually, which shall post the summary on the front doors of the school. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----